District of Columbia statutes.
50-2301.08

Report to Council.

By June 30th of each year, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a report on parking and traffic enforcement for the previous calendar year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)

The number of persons hired as hearing examiners:

(A)

The level of compensation for each hearing examiner;

(B)

The length of time each hearing examiner has served in that capacity; and

(C)

The qualifications for hearing examiners;

(2)

The number of notices of infraction issued:

(A)

The number of notices of infraction issued for moving infractions;

(B)

The number of notices of infraction issued for parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions; and

(C)

The number of notices of infraction issued by each agency authorized to issue notices of infraction;

(3)

The number of answers filed for moving infractions:

(A)

The number of “admit” answers filed for moving infractions:

(i)

The number of hearings held for respondents who admit the commission of moving infractions; and

(ii)

The number of suspensions and revocations of respondents who admit the commission of moving infractions;

(B)

The number of “admit with explanation” answers filed for moving infractions; the number of suspensions and revocations of respondents who admit with explanation the commission of a moving infraction;

(C)

The number of “deny” answers filed for moving infractions:

(i)

The number of determinations of liability of respondents who deny the commission of moving infractions;

(ii)

The number of dismissals of respondents who deny the commission of moving infractions; and

(iii)

The number of suspensions and revocations of respondents who deny the commission of moving infractions;

(D)

The number of suspensions for failure to answer notices of infraction; and

(E)

The number of suspensions for failure to appear at a hearing;

(4)

The number of answers filed for parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions:

(A)

The number of “admit” answers filed for parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions;

(B)

The number of “admit with explanation” answers filed for parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions; and

(C)

The number of “deny” answers filed for parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions:

(i)

The number of determinations of liability of respondents who deny the commission of parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions; and

(ii)

The number of dismissals of respondents who deny the commission of parking, standing, stopping and pedestrian infractions;

(5)

The number of notices of infraction for which sanctions are imposed:

(A)

The number of notices of infraction for which a civil fine is imposed;

(B)

The number of notices of infraction for which a penalty is imposed; and

(C)

The number of notices of infraction for which attendance at traffic school is required;

(6)

The number of notices of infraction issued to lessors covered under § 50-2303.04:

(A)

The penalties and fines imposed for infractions under § 50-2303.04;

(B)

The penalties and fines actually paid under § 50-2303.04;

(C)

The number of outstanding infractions under § 50-2303.04; and

(D)

The amount of fines and penalties outstanding under § 50-2303.04;

(7)

The number of appeals filed with the appeals boards:

(A)

The number of decisions set aside by appeals boards;

(B)

The number of decisions affirmed by appeals boards;

(C)

The list of attorneys available for service on appeals boards;

(D)

The list of citizens available for service on appeals boards; and

(E)

A list of each appeals board appointed by the Director;

(8)

The number of appeals filed with the Superior Court of the District of Columbia:

(A)

The number of decisions set aside by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia; and

(B)

The number of decisions affirmed by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia;

(9)

The number of appeals filed with the District of Columbia Court of Appeals:

(A)

The number of decisions set aside by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals; and

(B)

The number of decisions affirmed by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals;

(10)

The number of vehicles towed and booted:

(A)

The number of vehicles towed;

(B)

The number of vehicles booted;

(C)

The average cost of each tow; and

(D)

The average cost of each booting;

(11)

The total revenues generated by this chapter:

(A)

The total collected in fines and penalties;

(B)

The total collected in towing fees; and

(C)

The total collected in booting fees; and

(12)

The number of requests for reconsideration filed after an initial finding of liability:

(A)

The number of violations dismissed after reconsideration; and

(B)

The number of violations affirmed after reconsideration.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 108, 25 DCR 1275
July 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-127, § 3(c), 61 DCR 5711

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-608.
1973 Ed., § 40-1108.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-127 added (12) and made related changes.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-127: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-127, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7009, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-127, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7009, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.